Utah statutes.
73-18-15.   Board to adopt rules concerning water skiing and aquaplane riding and use of other devices towed behind a vessel.

The board shall adopt rules for the regulation and safety of water skiing and aquaplane riding, and the use of other devices which are towed behind a vessel.

